hunspell/spanish.aff
SFX A Y 13200
SFX A		 al		 al		aboral
SFX A		 al		 al		acial
SFX A		 al		 al		acional
SFX A		 al		 al		acromial
SFX A		 al		 al		aginal
SFX A		 al		 al		al
SFX A		 al		 al		alineal
SFX A		 al		 al		ambulacral
SFX A		 al		 al		amental
SFX A		 al		 al		añal
SFX A		 al		 al		ancial
SFX A		 al		 al		anial
SFX A		 al		 al		arcal
SFX A		 al		 al		arial
SFX A		 al		 al		asional
SFX A		 al		 al		astral
SFX A		 al		 al		atal
SFX A		 al		 al		aternal
SFX A		 al		 al		atorial
SFX A		 al		 al		atriarcal
SFX A		 al		 al		atrilateral
SFX A		 al		 al		aural
SFX A		 al		 al		axial
SFX A		 al		 al		barbital
SFX A		 al		 al		bial
SFX A		 al		 al		bital
SFX A		 al		 al		bucal
SFX A		 al		 al		cal
SFX A		 al		 al		catedral
SFX A		 al		 al		cecal
SFX A		 al		 al		central
SFX A		 al		 al		cereal
SFX A		 al		 al		cervical
SFX A		 al		 al		cesional
SFX A		 al		 al		cial
SFX A		 al		 al		cidental
SFX A		 al		 al		cinal
SFX A		 al		 al		cional
SFX A		 al		 al		cipal
SFX A		 al		 al		cipital
SFX A		 al		 al		clerical
SFX A		 al		 al		clonal
SFX A		 al		 al		coidal
SFX A		 al		 al		colateral
SFX A		 al		 al		congresual
SFX A		 al		 al		continental
SFX A		 al		 al		coronal
SFX A		 al		 al		cortical
SFX A		 al		 al		costal
SFX A		 al		 al		craneal
SFX A		 al		 al		crural
SFX A		 al		 al		ctoral
SFX A		 al		 al		ctorial
SFX A		 al		 al		ctural
SFX A		 al		 al		cuencial
SFX A		 al		 al		cultural
SFX A		 al		 al		dal
SFX A		 al		 al		delictual
SFX A		 al		 al		dencial
SFX A		 al		 al		deral
SFX A		 al		 al		dical
SFX A		 al		 al		dimensional
SFX A		 al		 al		dinal
SFX A		 al		 al		doctoral
SFX A		 al		 al		dorsal
SFX A		 al		 al		dral
SFX A		 al		 al		dual
SFX A		 al		 al		duodenal
SFX A		 al		 al		eal
SFX A		 al		 al		ecal
SFX A		 al		 al		ectorial
SFX A		 al		 al		edral
SFX A		 al		 al		educacional
SFX A		 al		 al		emal
SFX A		 al		 al		emial
SFX A		 al		 al		empresarial
SFX A		 al		 al		enal
SFX A		 al		 al		encial
SFX A		 al		 al		enial
SFX A		 al		 al		enoidal
SFX A		 al		 al		ensual
SFX A		 al		 al		ental
SFX A		 al		 al		epitelial
SFX A		 al		 al		eral
SFX A		 al		 al		erial
SFX A		 al		 al		ernal
SFX A		 al		 ales		acial
SFX A		 al		 ales		acional
SFX A		 al		 ales		adial
SFX A		 al		 ales		aginal
SFX A		 al		 ales		al
SFX A		 al		 ales		amental
SFX A		 al		 ales		anal
SFX A		 al		 ales		añal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ancial
SFX A		 al		 ales		anial
SFX A		 al		 ales		apical
SFX A		 al		 ales		arcal
SFX A		 al		 ales		arial
SFX A		 al		 ales		arterial
SFX A		 al		 ales		asional
SFX A		 al		 ales		atal
SFX A		 al		 ales		atriarcal
SFX A		 al		 ales		atrilateral
SFX A		 al		 ales		axial
SFX A		 al		 ales		bal
SFX A		 al		 ales		barbital
SFX A		 al		 ales		beral
SFX A		 al		 ales		bial
SFX A		 al		 ales		cal
SFX A		 al		 ales		catedral
SFX A		 al		 ales		ccidental
SFX A		 al		 ales		cecal
SFX A		 al		 ales		central
SFX A		 al		 ales		cesional
SFX A		 al		 ales		cial
SFX A		 al		 ales		cional
SFX A		 al		 ales		cipal
SFX A		 al		 ales		cipital
SFX A		 al		 al		escleral
SFX A		 al		 ales		clerical
SFX A		 al		 al		esclerocorneal
SFX A		 al		 ales		coaxial
SFX A		 al		 ales		codal
SFX A		 al		 ales		coidal
SFX A		 al		 ales		colateral
SFX A		 al		 ales		congresual
SFX A		 al		 ales		consorcial
SFX A		 al		 ales		continental
SFX A		 al		 ales		cordial
SFX A		 al		 ales		cortical
SFX A		 al		 ales		costal
SFX A		 al		 ales		craneal
SFX A		 al		 ales		crural
SFX A		 al		 ales		ctoral
SFX A		 al		 ales		ctual
SFX A		 al		 ales		ctural
SFX A		 al		 ales		cultural
SFX A		 al		 ales		dal
SFX A		 al		 ales		dencial
SFX A		 al		 ales		dental
SFX A		 al		 ales		deral
SFX A		 al		 ales		deverbal
SFX A		 al		 ales		dial
SFX A		 al		 ales		dical
SFX A		 al		 ales		dimensional
SFX A		 al		 ales		dinal
SFX A		 al		 ales		doctoral
SFX A		 al		 ales		dral
SFX A		 al		 ales		dual
SFX A		 al		 ales		duodenal
SFX A		 al		 ales		eal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ecal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ecial
SFX A		 al		 ales		ectual
SFX A		 al		 ales		ecuencial
SFX A		 al		 ales		edial
SFX A		 al		 ales		edral
SFX A		 al		 ales		egal
SFX A		 al		 ales		emental
SFX A		 al		 ales		emoral
SFX A		 al		 ales		enal
SFX A		 al		 ales		encial
SFX A		 al		 ales		endotelial
SFX A		 al		 ales		enial
SFX A		 al		 ales		enoidal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ensional
SFX A		 al		 ales		ensual
SFX A		 al		 ales		ental
SFX A		 al		 ales		entral
SFX A		 al		 ales		eral
SFX A		 al		 ales		erial
SFX A		 al		 ales		ernal
SFX A		 al		 ales		escleral
SFX A		 al		 ales		esclerocorneal
SFX A		 al		 ales		esencial
SFX A		 al		 ales		esfenoidal
SFX A		 al		 ales		esional
SFX A		 al		 ales		espinal
SFX A		 al		 ales		espiral
SFX A		 al		 ales		estacional
SFX A		 al		 ales		estal
SFX A		 al		 ales		estatal
SFX A		 al		 ales		estral
SFX A		 al		 ales		etal
SFX A		 al		 ales		etral
SFX A		 al		 ales		eural
SFX A		 al		 ales		facial
SFX A		 al		 ales		fal
SFX A		 al		 al		esfenoidal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ferencial
SFX A		 al		 ales		fernal
SFX A		 al		 ales		flexional
SFX A		 al		 ales		focal
SFX A		 al		 ales		foral
SFX A		 al		 ales		formal
SFX A		 al		 ales		frontal
SFX A		 al		 ales		genital
SFX A		 al		 ales		ginal
SFX A		 al		 ales		gonal
SFX A		 al		 ales		gubernamental
SFX A		 al		 ales		humeral
SFX A		 al		 ales		iacal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ial
SFX A		 al		 ales		ianual
SFX A		 al		 ales		ical
SFX A		 al		 ales		icial
SFX A		 al		 ales		icopenal
SFX A		 al		 ales		idal
SFX A		 al		 ales		idental
SFX A		 al		 ales		idimensional
SFX A		 al		 ales		idireccional
SFX A		 al		 ales		idual
SFX A		 al		 ales		ienal
SFX A		 al		 ales		iental
SFX A		 al		 ales		ifacial
SFX A		 al		 ales		ilateral
SFX A		 al		 ales		ilical
SFX A		 al		 ales		iluvial
SFX A		 al		 ales		imal
SFX A		 al		 ales		imestral
SFX A		 al		 ales		inal
SFX A		 al		 ales		inomial
SFX A		 al		 al		esional
SFX A		 al		 ales		ional
SFX A		 al		 ales		ipal
SFX A		 al		 ales		iral
SFX A		 al		 ales		isexual
SFX A		 al		 ales		ital
SFX A		 al		 ales		iteral
SFX A		 al		 ales		itual
SFX A		 al		 ales		ival
SFX A		 al		 ales		izal
SFX A		 al		 ales		jal
SFX A		 al		 ales		labial
SFX A		 al		 ales		laboral
SFX A		 al		 ales		lagrimal
SFX A		 al		 ales		larial
SFX A		 al		 ales		lateral
SFX A		 al		 ales		lemental
SFX A		 al		 ales		lexional
SFX A		 al		 ales		lial
SFX A		 al		 ales		lineal
SFX A		 al		 ales		lingual
SFX A		 al		 ales		local
SFX A		 al		 ales		loral
SFX A		 al		 ales		luvial
SFX A		 al		 ales		mal
SFX A		 al		 ales		manal
SFX A		 al		 ales		manial
SFX A		 al		 ales		mareal
SFX A		 al		 ales		marginal
SFX A		 al		 ales		matinal
SFX A		 al		 ales		maxilofacial
SFX A		 al		 ales		memorial
SFX A		 al		 ales		mensual
SFX A		 al		 ales		mestral
SFX A		 al		 ales		mial
SFX A		 al		 ales		moidal
SFX A		 al		 ales		moral
SFX A		 al		 ales		mortal
SFX A		 al		 ales		nal
SFX A		 al		 ales		nasal
SFX A		 al		 ales		natal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ncial
SFX A		 al		 ales		neal
SFX A		 al		 ales		nferencial
SFX A		 al		 ales		nial
SFX A		 al		 ales		nical
SFX A		 al		 ales		nidireccional
SFX A		 al		 ales		nival
SFX A		 al		 ales		noidal
SFX A		 al		 ales		normal
SFX A		 al		 ales		nstitucional
SFX A		 al		 ales		nsubstancial
SFX A		 al		 ales		ntal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ntanal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ntral
SFX A		 al		 ales		ntual
SFX A		 al		 ales		oaxial
SFX A		 al		 ales		obucal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ocal
SFX A		 al		 ales		occidental
SFX A		 al		 ales		occipital
SFX A		 al		 ales		ocervical
SFX A		 al		 ales		ocial
SFX A		 al		 ales		oclusal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ocrural
SFX A		 al		 ales		ocubital
SFX A		 al		 ales		odental
SFX A		 al		 ales		oduodenal
SFX A		 al		 ales		oetmoidal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ofacial
SFX A		 al		 ales		ofocal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ofrontal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ogonal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ohumeral
SFX A		 al		 ales		oidal
SFX A		 al		 ales		olabial
SFX A		 al		 ales		olateral
SFX A		 al		 ales		olocal
SFX A		 al		 ales		omial
SFX A		 al		 ales		onal
SFX A		 al		 ales		onasal
SFX A		 al		 ales		oneal
SFX A		 al		 ales		ontal
SFX A		 al		 ales		oral
SFX A		 al		 ales		ordial
SFX A		 al		 ales		orial
