hunspell/spanish.dic
abertal/A
aboquillado/A
absorbio/A
acallante/A
accesible/A
acetilénico/A
acido/A
acomplejo/A
acrílico/A
activo/A
adaptable/A
adinámico/A
adorable/A
adulterino/A
aerolítico/A
aflictivo/A
aglutinativo/A
agresor/A
ahilar/A
ajornalo/A
albúreo/A
alegado/A
algazul/A
aliviano/A
alomador/A
altisonante/A
amargo/A
amenazador/A
amoniacal/A
anabaptista/A
ancestral/A
anfidrómico/A
anión/A
antedatario/A
antiexplosivo/A
antirrotatorio/A
apacente/A
aplaudí/A
apulgaro/A
argárico/A
arrocero/A
aserrador/A
astragalocalcaneoescafoideo/A
aterrador/A
auriñaciense/A
autoinductancio/A
axiodistal/A
bajero/A
barredor/A
behenato/A
bicigomático/A
bimensual/A
bivariable/A
bolineador/A
botinero/A
bromodietilacetilúreo/A
buril/A
cachudo/A
calificador/A
campal/A
cantoné/A
carbonífero/A
carotidotimpánico/A
casuista/A
cavil/A
cecal/A
cementerial/A
cernejudo/A
charnega/A
chuco/A
cigomaticofrontal/A
cisalpino/A
claviforme/A
coarrendador/A
coincidente/A
colombófilo/A
compatible/A
concepcionista/A
condrito/A
congeniado/A
consiguiente/A
contradigo/A
conversor/A
coreográfico/A
corroborante/A
cotizante/A
criptogenético/A
cuadragenario/A
ácueo/A
cáustico/A
decenal/A
deformante/A
demeritorio/A
deontológico/A
desaguador/A
desbordante/A
descornador/A
desenfurecido/A
deshollinador/A
desmigado/A
despenador/A
destiento/A
devanador/A
diatérmano/A
difuso/A
diorítico/A
diserto/A
disturbado/A
dolor/A
dravita/A
ecotoxicológico/A
ejerciente/A
elegible/A
embracilado/A
emplomador/A
encapote/A
encubridor/A
enfitéutico/A
enjuiciable/A
ensordecedor/A
entubado/A
epilogo/A
erosionable/A
escenificable/A
escupí/A
espantapájaro/A
esplácnico/A
estapediovestibular/A
estimatorio/A
estupefactivo/A
eutectoide/A
excéntrico/A
expatrio/A
exterminable/A
exutorio/A
fandanguero/A
fecundable/A
ferruginoso/A
filtrante/A
flavo/A
folklórico/A
foso/A
frangible/A
frontonasal/A
fundario/A
galbanoso/A
garibaldino/A
generoso/A
gestacional/A
globalizador/A
gordiano/A
gravídico/A
guanino/A
habenular/A
hegemónico/A
hepatorrenal/A
heteroplástico/A
hidroneumático/A
hiperplásico/A
hispano/A
homocinético/A
hospiciano/A
icástico/A
iliturgitano/A
imperturbable/A
imputable/A
incinerador/A
inconsciente/A
indeciso/A
indólico/A
infalible/A
infructuoso/A
inmaterial/A
inodoro/A
insoslayable/A
interactivo/A
interfibrilar/A
interruptor/A
intraperióstico/A
involucre/A
irrisorio/A
isoquimeño/A
jaenés/A
judo/A
laboralista/A
lamer/A
lauro/A
lenificativo/A
liberal/A
limosneo/A
litigioso/A
logrado/A
lumbrado/A
macróspor/A
malacostumbrado/A
manantío/A
manumiti/A
maríneo/A
matrimonesco/A
medicamentoso/A
membrado/A
meristemático/A
metafórico/A
microcelular/A
mimetesita/A
mitótico/A
moledero/A
monofiodonto/A
moño/A
mostrador/A
multiangular/A
murallón/A
naranjado/A
negacionista/A
neumático/A
nitroalmidón/A
nostálgico/A
nutritivo/A
occiso/A
oftalmoscópico/A
omnívoro/A
opugnario/A
oropelero/A
ouguiya/A
pajil/A
paléstrico/A
papanato/A
parasimpático/A
parroquiano/A
patidifuso/A
pecoso/A
pelitieso/A
pequeñoburgués/A
perifrástico/A
persecutorio/A
peyotista/A
pincelar/A
pirítico/A
platicultivo/A
pluriofensivo/A
polietápico/A
poncí/A
portero/A
postural/A
precámbrico/A
preludío/A
presumí/A
probabilístico/A
promedio/A
protestatario/A
psicodepresor/A
pujante/A
quebequés/A
quinto/A
radiogénico/A
rastreable/A
recalcador/A
reconstituido/A
redaccional/A
reformable/A
rehecho/A
rememorativo/A
reparono/A
republícano/A
respigador/A
retornable/A
reverbero/A
rigoroso/A
rodeador/A
rotoempacador/A
sabañero/A
salgar/A
sanitario/A
satírico/A
segregante/A
semiheterotípico/A
señorial/A
seso/A
sigiloso/A
sincrónico/A
símico/A
sociolingüístico/A
sonero/A
subafluente/A
subobjetivo/A
sucesional/A
sumador/A
suplantado/A
suscripto/A
talentoso/A
tartarizo/A
telequélico/A
tenístico/A
termométrico/A
tetrafásico/A
tintineario/A
todopoderoso/A
torpe/A
trajano/A
translúcido/A
trascontinental/A
tratable/A
tricálcico/A
trinitario/A
tropezoso/A
turbativo/A
ultramundano/A
univariable/A
uvero/A
vaquerizo/A
veneciano/A
verecundo/A
vierto/A
viscoelástico/A
vociferante/A
wormiano/A
zaheridor/A
zoide/A
